California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
The department may permit the exclusion of coverage or benefits for charges or expenses incurred by a subscriber during the first six months of enrollment in the program for any condition for which, during the six months immediately preceding enrollment in the program medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was recommended or received as to the condition during that period.

However, the exclusion from coverage of this section shall be waived to the extent to which the subscriber was covered under any creditable coverage, as defined in Section 10900 of the Insurance Code, that was terminated, provided the subscriber has applied for enrollment in the program not later than 63 days following termination of the prior coverage, or within 180
 days of termination of coverage if the subscriber lost his or her previous creditable coverage because the subscriber’s employment ended, the availability of health coverage offered through employment or sponsored by an employer terminated, or an employer’s contribution toward health coverage terminated. The exclusion from coverage of this section shall also be waived as to any condition of a subscriber previously receiving coverage under a plan of another state similar to the program established by this chapter if the subscriber was eligible for benefits under that other-state coverage for the condition. The department may establish alternative mechanisms applicable to enrollment in participating health plans. These mechanisms may include, but are not limited to, a postenrollment waiting period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15885.5.

If more than one participating health plan is offered, the department shall make available to applicants eligible to enroll in the program sufficient information to make an informed choice among the various types of participating health plans. Each applicant shall be issued an appropriate document setting forth or summarizing the services to which an enrollee is entitled, procedures for obtaining major risk medical coverage, a list of contracting health plans and providers, and a summary of grievance procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 626.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15886.

After the applicant notifies the department in writing of his or her choice of participating health plan, the department shall assist the applicant in enrolling as a subscriber and securing major risk medical coverage for the subscriber and any dependents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15886.5.

A subscriber may request a change in coverage based upon a change in the family status of any dependent, by filing an application within 30 days after the occurrence of the change in family status, or at other times and under conditions as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15887.

Health coverage secured through the program shall permit a covered dependent of a subscriber to elect to continue the same coverage upon the death of the subscriber, or upon the subscriber becoming eligible for Medicare Part A and Part B.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15887.5.

A transfer of enrollment from one participating health plan to another may be made by a subscriber at times and under conditions as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15888.

If a subscriber is dissatisfied with any action or failure to act which has occurred in connection with a participating plan’s coverage, the subscriber shall have the right to appeal to the department and shall be accorded an opportunity for a fair hearing. Hearings may be conducted, insofar as practicable, pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15888.5.

Subscribers and their dependents who become eligible for Medicare Part A and Part B, excluding those on Medicare solely because of end-stage renal disease, shall not be enrolled, or continue to be enrolled, in major risk medical coverage afforded by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Plan Rates and Compensation from the Fund [15890. - 15891.5.]

15890.

Upon enrollment as a subscriber in the program, the subscriber shall be responsible for payment of the subscriber contribution. Termination of coverage by a participating health plan for nonpayment of the subscriber contribution shall be governed by the same laws and regulations by which the participating health plan is regulated as to all its subscribers and enrollees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15890.5.

Each health plan contracting with the department pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 15881) shall submit annually to the department rates which it estimates are sufficient to cover the cost of providing major risk medical coverage to its subscribers. The rates shall be submitted on the basis of categories of risk which shall be established by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15891.

(a) The department shall establish program contribution amounts for each category of risk for each participating health plan. The program contribution amounts shall be based on the average amount of subsidy funds required for the program as a whole. To determine the average amount of subsidy funds required, the department shall calculate a loss ratio, including all medical costs, administration fees, and risk payments, for the program in the prior calendar year. The loss ratio shall be calculated using 125 percent of the standard average individual rates for comparable coverage as the denominator, and all medical costs, administration fees, and risk payments as the numerator. The average amount of subsidy funds required is calculated by subtracting 100 percent
 from the program loss ratio. For purposes of calculating the program loss ratio, no participating health plan’s loss ratio shall be less than 100 percent and participating health plans with fewer than 1,000 program members shall be excluded from the calculation.

Subscriber contributions shall be established to encourage members to select those health plans requiring subsidy funds at or below the program average subsidy. Subscriber contribution amounts shall be established so that no subscriber receives a subsidy greater than the program average subsidy, except that:

(1) In all areas of the state, at least one plan shall be available to program participants at an average subscriber contribution of 125 percent of the standard average individual rates for comparable coverage.

(2) No subscriber contribution shall be increased by more than 10
 percent above 125 percent of the standard average individual rates for comparable coverage.

(3) Subscriber contributions for participating health plans joining the program after January 1, 1997, shall be established at 125 percent of the standard average individual rates for comparable coverage for the first two benefit years the plan participates in the program.

(b) The department shall pay program contribution amounts to participating health plans from the Major Risk Medical Insurance Fund.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2013, in addition to the amount of subsidy funds required pursuant to subdivision (a), the department may further subsidize subscriber contributions so that the amount paid by each subscriber is below 125 percent of the standard average individual risk rate for comparable coverage but no less than 100
 percent of the standard average individual risk rate for comparable coverage. For purposes of calculating premiums for the following products, any reference to, or use of, subscriber contributions, premiums, average premiums, or amounts paid by subscribers in the program shall be construed to mean subscriber contributions as described in subdivision (a) without application of the additional subsidies permitted by this subdivision:

(1) Standard benefit plans pursuant to Section 10127.16 of the Insurance Code and Section 1373.622 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Health benefit plans and health care service plan contracts for federally eligible defined individuals pursuant to Sections 10901.3 and 10901.9 of the Insurance Code and Sections 1399.805 and 1399.811 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Conversion coverage
 pursuant to Section 12682.1 of the Insurance Code and Section 1373.6 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------

15891.5.

A participating health plan may charge subscriber contributions under this article that do not exceed the difference between its plan rate for the category of risk and the program contribution amount for the category of risk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Major Risk Medical Insurance Fund [15893. - 15895.]

15893.

(a) There is hereby continued in existence in the State Treasury a special fund known as the Major Risk Medical Insurance Fund that is, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes specified in Section 15894, Section 10127.16 of the Insurance Code, and Section 1373.622 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Funds may be deposited in the Major Risk Medical Insurance Fund from one or more of the following accounts in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund:

(1) The Hospital Services Account.

(2) The Physician Services Account.

(3) The Unallocated Account.

(c) Effective July 1, 2017, the Major Risk Medical Insurance Fund in the State Treasury is abolished and all moneys in the fund shall be transferred to the Health Care Services Plan Fines and Penalties Fund created pursuant to subdivision (d). Any remaining balance, assets, liabilities, and encumbrances of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Fund as of July 1, 2017, shall be transferred to, and become part of, the Health Care Services Plan Fines and Penalties Fund.

(d) There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund known as the Health Care Services Plan Fines and Penalties Fund that is, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, continuously appropriated to the department for the purpose of funding the nonfederal share of health care services for children, adults, seniors,
 persons with disabilities, and dual-eligible beneficiaries in the Medi-Cal program.

(e) Any law that refers to the Major Risk Medical Insurance Fund, including, but not limited to, a reference in this chapter to the Major Risk Medical Insurance Fund or the “fund,” shall be construed to refer to the Health Care Services Plan Fines and Penalties Fund, effective July 1, 2017.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the funds in the Health Care Services Plan Fines and Penalties Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 82.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

15894.

(a) Except as provided in Section 15894.5, the department shall authorize the expenditure of money in the fund to cover program expenses, including program expenses that exceed subscriber contributions, and to cover expenses relating to Section 10127.16 of the Insurance Code, Section 1373.622 of the Health and Safety Code, and health care services for eligible individuals in the Medi-Cal program. The department shall determine the amount of funds expended for each of these purposes, taking into consideration the requirements of this chapter, Section 10127.16 of the Insurance Code, and Section 1373.622 of the Health and Safety Code. Funds may be expended for health care services for eligible individuals in the Medi-Cal program only after all costs for the administration and delivery of health care services under Section 1373.622
 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10127.16 of the Insurance Code have been fully funded.

(b) Following consultation with a health care service plan or health insurer, if the department and the health care service plan or health insurer have not agreed to a final reconciliation of the amount to be expended from the fund or to be reimbursed to the fund, the department shall give written notice of its determination to the health care service plan or health insurer of the final reconciliation amount, as determined by the department. The health care service plan or health insurer shall remit payment to the department within 60 days of the date of notice from the department. If payment is not received, interest shall accrue in the amount of 7 percent per annum. The department may offset the amount to be reimbursed to the fund against any other payments owed to the health care service plan or health insurer by the department, or may negotiate
 a payment plan with the health care service plan or health insurer for full payment, and in that case may waive interest accrual as long as payment from the health care service plan or health insurer is made in accordance with the payment plan. This subdivision shall control over any conflict or ambiguity between this subdivision and the provisions of Section 1373.622 of the Health and Safety Code, Section 10127.16 of the Insurance Code, Part 6.5 (commencing with Section 12700) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, or this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 52, Sec. 81.   (SB 97)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15894.5.

(a) From money appropriated by the Legislature to the fund, the department may expend sufficient funds to carry out the purposes of this chapter and of Section 10127.16 of the Insurance Code, and Section 1373.622 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) However, the state is not liable beyond the assets of the fund for any obligations incurred, or liabilities sustained, in the operation of the California Major Risk Medical Insurance Program or for the expenditures described in Section 10127.16 of the Insurance Code and Section 1373.622 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 627.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15895.

Any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year may be carried forward to the next succeeding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 90.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 15872.5.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.5. HEALTH CARE COVERAGE INITIATIVE [15900. - 15908.]

15900.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Approximately 21 percent of nonelderly Californians lack health insurance coverage. Many are low-income individuals who are not eligible for existing public health coverage programs.

(b) One hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) in federal funds will be available for three years to reimburse for public expenditures made under a Health Care Coverage Initiative for uninsured individuals. These funds are to be provided pursuant to the Special Terms and Conditions of California’s Section 1115 Medicaid demonstration project waiver number 11-W-00193/9 relating to hospital financing and health coverage expansion.

(c) California’s health care safety net system plays an essential role in delivering critical health services to low-income individuals.

(d) Local governments have the unique ability to design health service delivery models that meet the needs of their diverse populations and build on local infrastructures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 76, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 2006.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 15908.   Repealed six months after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 15908.)
-------------------------------------------

15901.

(a) There is hereby established the Health Care Coverage Initiative to expand health care coverage to low-income uninsured individuals in California.

(b) The Health Care Coverage Initiative shall operate pursuant to the Special Terms and Conditions of California’s Section 1115 Medicaid demonstration project waiver number 11-W-00193/9 relating to hospital financing and health coverage expansion that became effective September 1, 2005. The initiative shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 76, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 2006.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 15908.   Repealed six months after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 15908.)
-------------------------------------------

15902.

(a) Persons eligible to be served by the Health Care Coverage Initiative are low-income uninsured individuals who are not currently eligible for the Medi-Cal program, Healthy Families Program, or Access for Infants and Mothers program.

(b) Funding for the Health Care Coverage Initiative shall be used to expand health care coverage for eligible uninsured individuals.

(c) Any expansion of health care coverage for uninsured individuals shall not diminish access to health care available for other uninsured individuals, including access through disproportionate share hospitals, county clinics, or community clinics.

(d) Services provided under the Health Care Coverage Initiative shall be available to those eligible uninsured individuals enrolled in a Health Care Coverage program, and nothing in this part shall be construed to create an entitlement program of any kind.

(e) No state General Fund moneys shall be used to fund the Health Care Coverage Initiative, nor to fund any related administrative costs provided to counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 76, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 2006.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 15908.   Repealed six months after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 15908.)
-------------------------------------------

15903.

The Health Care Coverage Initiative shall be designed and implemented to achieve all of the following outcomes:

(a) Expand the number of Californians who have health care coverage.

(b) Strengthen and build upon the local health care safety net system, including disproportionate share hospitals, county clinics, and community clinics.

(c) Improve access to high quality health care and health outcomes for individuals.

(d) Create efficiencies in the delivery of health services that could lead to savings in health care costs.

(e) Provide grounds for long-term sustainability of the programs funded under the initiative.

(f) Implement programs in an expeditious manner in order to meet federal requirements regarding the timing of expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 76, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 2006.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 15908.   Repealed six months after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 15908.)
-------------------------------------------

15904.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall issue a request for applications for funding the Health Care Coverage Initiative.

(b) The department shall allocate federal funds available to be claimed under the Health Care Coverage programs.

(c) The department shall select the Health Care Coverage programs that best meet the requirements and desired outcomes set forth in this part.

(d) The following elements shall be used in evaluating the proposals to make selections and to determine the allocation of the available funds:

(1) Enrollment processes, with an identification system to demonstrate enrollment of the uninsured into the program.

(2) Use of a medical record system, which may include electronic medical records.

(3) Designation of a medical home and assignment of eligible individuals to a primary care provider. For purposes of this paragraph, “medical home” means a single provider or facility that maintains all of an individual’s medical information. The primary care provider shall be a provider from which the enrollee can access primary and preventive care.

(4) Provision of a benefit package of services, including preventive and primary care services, and care management services designed to treat individuals with chronic health care conditions, mental illness, or who have high costs associated with their medical conditions, to improve their health and decrease future costs. Benefits may include case management services.

(5) Quality monitoring processes to assess the health care outcomes of individuals enrolled in the Health Care Coverage program.

(6) Promotion of the use of preventive services and early intervention.

(7) The provision of care to Medi-Cal beneficiaries by the applicant and the degree to which the applicant coordinates its care with services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(8) Screening and enrollment processes for individuals who may qualify for enrollment into Medi-Cal, the Healthy Families Program, and the Access for Infants and Mothers Program prior to enrollment into the Health Care Coverage program.

(9) The ability to demonstrate how the Health Care Coverage program will promote the viability of the existing safety net health care system.

(10) Documentation to support the applicant’s ability to implement the Health Care Coverage program by September 1, 2007, and to use its allocation for each project year.

(11) Demonstration of how the program will provide consumer assistance to individuals applying to, participating in, or accessing services in the program.

(e) Entities eligible to apply for the initiative funds are a county, city and county, consortium of counties serving a region consisting of more than one county, or health authority. No entity shall submit more than one proposal.

(f) The department shall rank the program applications based on the criteria in this section. The amount of federal funding available to be claimed shall be allocated based upon the ranking of the applications. The department shall allocate the available federal funding to the highest ranking applications until all of the funding is allocated. The department shall select at least five programs, and no single program shall receive an allocation greater than 30 percent of the total federal allotment. The department is not required to fund the entire amount requested in a program application.

(g) The department shall seek to balance the allocations throughout geographic areas of the state.

(h) Each county, city and county, consortium of counties, or health authority that is selected to receive funding shall provide the necessary local funds for the nonfederal share of the certified public expenditures, or intergovernmental transfers to the extent allowable under the demonstration project, required to claim the federal funds made available from the federal allotment. The certified public expenditures, or intergovernmental transfers to the extent allowable under the demonstration project, shall meet the requirements of the Special Terms and Conditions of California’s Section 1115 Medicaid demonstration project waiver number 11-W-00193/9 relating to hospital financing and health coverage expansion that became effective September 1, 2005.

(i) The federal allocation shall be available to the selected programs for the three-year period covering the Health Care Coverage program pursuant to the Special Terms and Conditions of California’s Section 1115 Medicaid demonstration project waiver number 11-W-00193/9 relating to hospital financing and health coverage expansion, unless the selected programs do not incur expenditures sufficient to claim the allocation of federal funds in the particular program year. Selected programs shall expend the funds according to an expenditure schedule determined by the department.

(j) The department may reallocate the available federal funds among selected programs or other program applicants that were previously not selected for funding, if necessary to meet federal requirements regarding the timing of expenditures, notwithstanding subdivision (f). If a selected program fails to substantially comply with the requirements of this article, the department may reallocate the available federal funds from that selected program to other selected programs or other program applications that previously were not selected for funding. If a selected program is unable to meet its spending targets, determined at the end of the second quarter of each program year, the department may reallocate funds to other selected programs or other program applications that previously were not selected for funding, to ensure that all available federal funds are claimed. Selected programs receiving reallocated funds must have the ability to make the certified public expenditures necessary to claim the reallocated federal funds.

(k) Federal funds provided for the initiative shall supplement, and not supplant, any county, city and county, health authority, state, or federal funds that would otherwise be spent on health care services in the county, city and county, consortium of counties, or a health authority region. Federal funds allocated under the initiative shall reimburse the selected county, city and county, consortium of counties, or health authority for the benefits and services provided under subdivision (d) of Section 15904. Administrative costs associated with the development and management of the initiative shall not be paid from the Health Care Coverage program allocation, and any allocations for administrative funds shall be in addition to the allocations made for the initiative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 483, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 15908.   Repealed six months after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 15908.)
-------------------------------------------

15905.

Applications submitted to the department shall include, but not be limited to, each of the following:

(a) A description of the proposed Health Care Coverage program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Eligibility criteria.

(2) Screening and enrollment processes that include an identification system to demonstrate enrollment into the Health Care Coverage program.

(3) Screening processes to identify individuals who may qualify for enrollment into Medi-Cal, the Healthy Families Program, or the Access for Infants and Mothers Program.

(b) A description of the quality monitoring system to be implemented with the Health Care Coverage program.

(c) A description of the population to be served.

(d) A list of health care providers who have agreed to participate in the Health Care Coverage program.

(e) A description of the organized health care delivery systems to be used for the Health Care Coverage program, including, but not limited to, designation of a medical home and processes used to assign eligible individuals to a primary care provider.

(f) A list of the health benefits to be provided, including the preventive and primary care services and how they will be promoted.

(g) A description of the care management services to be provided, and the providers of those services.

(h) A calculation of the average cost per individual served.

(i) The number of individuals to be served.

(j) The mechanism under which the proposed Health Care Coverage Initiative will make expenditures to, or on behalf of, providers and other entities, including, but not limited to, documentation to support the ability to implement the Health Care Coverage program by September 1, 2007, and to claim the full amount of the allocation for each program year.

(k) A description of the source of the local nonfederal share of funds.

(l) A description of how the proposed Health Care Coverage program will strengthen the local health care safety net system.

(m) A consent form signed by the applicant to provide requested data elements as required per the Special Terms and Conditions of California’s Section 1115 Medicaid demonstration project waiver number 11-W-00193/9 relating to hospital financing and health coverage expansion.

(n) Use of a reliable medical record system, that may include, but need not be limited to, existing electronic medical records.

(o) A complete description of health care services currently provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and a description as to how the proposed Health Care Coverage program will coordinate its Health Care Coverage program with services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 76, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 2006.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 15908.   Repealed six months after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 15908.)
-------------------------------------------

15906.

(a) The department shall seek partnership with an independent, nonprofit group or foundation, an academic institution, or a governmental entity providing grants for health-related activities, to evaluate the programs funded under the initiative.

(b) The evaluation shall, at a minimum, include an assessment of the extent to which the programs have met the outcomes listed in Section 15903.

(c) The department and the selected programs shall provide the data for the evaluation.

(d) The evaluation shall be submitted concurrently to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and to the Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 76, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 2006.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 15908.   Repealed six months after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 15908.)
-------------------------------------------

15907.

(a) The department shall monitor the programs funded under the initiative for compliance with applicable federal requirements and the requirements under this part, and pursuant to the Special Terms and Conditions of California’s Section 1115 Medicaid demonstration project waiver number 11-W-00193/9 relating to hospital financing and health coverage expansion.

(b) To the extent necessary to implement this part, the department shall submit, by September 1, 2006, to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, proposed waiver amendments on the structure of, and eligibility and benefits under, the Health Care Coverage Initiative.

(c) The department shall monitor the allocations to selected programs at least quarterly for spending levels.

(d) No funds made available from the Health Care Support Fund for the Health Care Coverage Initiative shall be used by the department for administration.

(e) The request for applications, including any part of the process described herein for selecting entities to operate the Health Care Coverage programs, and any agreements entered into with a county, city and county, consortium of counties, or health authority pursuant to this part shall not be subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(f) The department may adopt regulations to implement this part. These regulations may initially be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). For purposes of this part, the adoption of regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety or general welfare. Any emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall not remain in effect subsequent to the date that this part is repealed pursuant to Section 15908.

(g) As an alternative to subdivision (f), and notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, the department may implement and administer this part by means of provider bulletins, county letters, manuals, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. The department shall notify the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature of its intent to issue a provider bulletin, county letter, manual, or other similar instruction, at least five days prior to issuance. In addition, the department shall provide a copy of any provider bulletin, county letter, manual, or other similar instruction issued under this paragraph to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(h) The department shall consult with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders regarding the implementation and ongoing administration of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 76, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 2006.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 15908.   Repealed six months after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 15908.)
-------------------------------------------

15908.

(a) This part shall become inoperative on the date that the director executes a declaration, which shall be retained by the director and provided to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature, stating that the Low Income Health Program authorized under Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 15909) and under the Special Terms and Conditions of the demonstration project, as defined in Section 15909.1, has been implemented, and that each Health Care Coverage Initiative program approved under this part that has sought approval under Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 15909) has been transitioned to a Low Income Health Program, if authorized under the demonstration project and Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 15909), and shall, six months after the date the declaration is
 executed, be repealed.

(b) In addition to the requirements specified in subdivision (a), the director shall post the declaration on the department’s Internet Web site and the director shall send the declaration to the Secretary of State and the Legislative Counsel.

(c) Until the effective date of the repeal of this part pursuant to subdivision (a), the director may continue and administer any extensions, modifications, or continuation of the projects under this part approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 23.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Termination clause affects Part 3.5, commencing with Section 15900.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.6. Low Income Health Program [15909. - 15916.]

15909.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Pursuant to Section 14180, the Legislature directed the department to apply for a successor federal waiver or demonstration project, in part, to coincide with the end of the waiver described in relevant part in subdivision (b) of Section 15900 to, among other requirements, optimize opportunities to increase federal financial participation and maximize financial resources to address uncompensated care.

(b) Passage of federal health care reform, pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended
 by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), presents new options of federal support for coverage of low-income individuals and significant expansion of state coverage programs in 2014. Through the success of the Health Care Coverage Initiatives established pursuant to Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 15900), and with implementation of a successor federal Medicaid waiver or demonstration project, California is well positioned to develop enrollment and coverage expansion models that will lead the way to full implementation of comprehensive health care reforms in 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 723, Sec. 2.   (AB 342)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

15909.1.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Demonstration project” means a federal waiver or demonstration project described in Section 14180 approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that authorizes the implementation of a successor to the Health Care Coverage Initiative under Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 15900).

(b) (1) “Eligible entity” means any of the following:

(A) A county.

(B) A city and county.

(C) A consortium of counties serving a region consisting of more than one county.

(D) A health authority.

(E) A nondesignated public hospital, or the entity with which it is affiliated, if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) The hospital is located in a county that does
 not have a designated public hospital.

(ii) The county does not intend to operate a LIHP pursuant to Section 15910.5.

(iii) If the county previously filed an application to operate a LIHP, the county has formally withdrawn its application.

(2) For purposes of this section and to the extent allowed under the Special Terms and Conditions of the
 demonstration project, a County Medical Services Program shall be considered a consortium of counties serving a region consisting of more than one county.

(c) “LIHP” means a local Low Income Health Program authorized pursuant to this part that is comprised of the following populations:

(1) The Medicaid Coverage Expansion (MCE) population, which means low-income individuals 19 to 64 years of age, inclusive, who are not pregnant, have family incomes at or below 133 percent of the federal poverty level, are not eligible for the Medi-Cal program or the Children’s Health Insurance Program, are United States citizens, nationals, or have satisfactory immigration status, and meet the county of residence requirements.

(2) The